src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-wacho_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
# object conjugation involves direct and indirect object

  Verb - wacho: # Verb 'to say' - full paradigm
     wacho+V+Inf: wacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: nawacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: niwacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: nowacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: newawacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: neuwacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: negiwacho

     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg1: niwachona
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg1: nowachona
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg1: neuwachona
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg1: negiwachona
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg2: nawachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg2: nowachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg2: newawachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg2: negiwachoni
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: nawachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: niwachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: nowachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: newawachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: neuwachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: negiwachone
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl1: nawachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl1: niwachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl1: nowachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl1: neuwachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl1: negiwachonwa
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl2: nawachou
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl2: nowachou
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl2: newawachou
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl2: negiwachou
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: nawachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: niwachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: nowachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: newawachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: neuwachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: negiwachogi


## i- present continuative

     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1: awacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2: iwacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3: owacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1: wawacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2: uwacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3: giwacho

#
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+OcSg1: iwachona
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcSg1: owachona
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2+OcSg1: uwachona
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcSg1: giwachona
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcSg2: awachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcSg2: owachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1+OcSg2: wawachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcSg2: giwachoni
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcSg3: awachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+OcSg3: iwachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcSg3: owachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1+OcSg3: wawachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2+OcSg3: uwachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcSg3: giwachone
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcPl1: awachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+OcPl1: iwachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcPl1: owachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2+OcPl1: uwachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcPl1: giwachonwa
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcPl2: awachou
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcPl2: owachou
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1+OcPl2: wawachou
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcPl2: giwachou
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg1+OcPl3: awachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg2+OcPl3: iwachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScSg3+OcPl3: owachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl1+OcPl3: wawachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl2+OcPl3: uwachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PrsCont+ScPl3+OcPl3: giwachogi

##ibro- future

     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1: abrowacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2: ibrowacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3: obrowacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1: wabrowacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2: ubrowacho
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3: gibrowacho

#
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcSg1: ibrowachona
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcSg1: obrowachona
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcSg1: ubrowachona
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcSg1: gibrowachona
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcSg2: abrowachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcSg2: obrowachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcSg2: wabrowachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcSg2: gibrowachoni
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcSg3: abrowachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcSg3: ibrowachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcSg3: obrowachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcSg3: wabrowachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcSg3: ubrowachone
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcSg3: gibrowachone
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcPl1: abrowachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcPl1: ibrowachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcPl1: obrowachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcPl1: ubrowachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcPl1: gibrowachonwa
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcPl2: abrowachou
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcPl2: obrowachou
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcPl2: wabrowachou
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcPl2: gibrowachou
#
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcPl3: abrowachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcPl3: ibrowachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcPl3: obrowachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcPl3: wabrowachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcPl3: ubrowachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcPl3: gibrowachogi

## CONDITION

     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg1: kawacho
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg2: kiwacho
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg3: kowacho
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl1: kawawacho
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl2: kauwacho
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl3: kagiwacho

#
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg1: kiwachona
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg1: kowachona
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg1: kauwachona
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg1: kagiwachona
#
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg2: kawachoni
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg2: kowachoni
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg2: kawawachoni
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg2: kagiwachoni
#
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: kawachone
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: kiwachone
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: kowachone
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: kawawachone
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: kauwachone
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: kagiwachone
#
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl1: kawachonwa
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl1: kiwachonwa
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl1: kowachonwa
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl1: kauwachonwa
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl1: kagiwachonwa
#
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl2: kawachonu
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl2: kowachonu
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl2: kawawachonu
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl2: kagiwachonu
#
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: kawachogi
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: kiwachogi
     wacho+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: kowachogi
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: kawawachogi
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: kauwachogi
     wacho+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: kagiwachogi
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg1: nasewacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg2: nisewacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg3: nosewacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl1: newasewacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl2: neusewacho
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl3: negisewacho

     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg2+OcSg1: nisewachona
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg3+OcSg1: nosewachona
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl2+OcSg1: neusewachona
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl3+OcSg1: negisewachona
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg1+OcSg2: nasewachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg3+OcSg2: nosewachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl1+OcSg2: newasewachoni
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl3+OcSg2: negisewachoni
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg1+OcSg3: nasewachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg2+OcSg3: nisewachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg3+OcSg3: nosewachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl1+OcSg3: newasewachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl2+OcSg3: neusewachone
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl3+OcSg3: negisewachone
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg1+OcPl1: nasewachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg2+OcPl1: nisewachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg3+OcPl1: nosewachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl2+OcPl1: neusewachonwa
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl3+OcPl1: negisewachonwa
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg1+OcPl2: nasewachou
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg3+OcPl2: nosewachou
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl1+OcPl2: newasewachou
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl3+OcPl2: negisewachou
#
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg1+OcPl3: nasewachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg2+OcPl3: nisewachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScSg3+OcPl3: nosewachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl1+OcPl3: newasewachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl2+OcPl3: neusewachogi
     wacho+V+Ind+PluPrf+ScPl3+OcPl3: negisewachogi
